Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Chapter 03. Termination, Continuation and Reestablishment of Regulatory Boards.

Cross references. —

For review of the activities of agencies, boards and commissions, see AS 44.66.

Sec. 08.03.010.
Termination dates for regulatory boards.

[Repealed, § 4 ch 14 SLA 1987.]

[Repealed, § 4 ch 14 SLA 1987.]

The following boards have the termination date provided by this subsection:

Board of Public Accountancy (AS

08.04.010

) — June 30, 2029;

Board of Governors of the Alaska Bar Association (AS

08.08.040

) — June 30, 2029;

State Board of Registration for Architects, Engineers, and Land Surveyors ( AS

08.48.011

) — June 30, 2025;

Board of Barbers and Hairdressers (AS

08.13.010

) — June 30, 2027;

Board of Chiropractic Examiners ( AS

08.20.010

) — June 30, 2022;

Board of Professional Counselors ( AS

08.29.010

) — June 30, 2026;

Board of Dental Examiners (AS

08.36.010

) — June 30, 2027;

Board of Certified Direct-Entry Midwives (AS

08.65.010

) — June 30, 2023;

Big Game Commercial Services Board (AS

08.54.591

) — June 30, 2024;

Board of Marine Pilots (AS

08.62.010

) — June 30, 2027;

Board of Marital and Family Therapy ( AS

08.63.010

) — June 30, 2026;

Board of Massage Therapists ( AS

08.61.010

) — June 30, 2024;

State Medical Board (AS

08.64.010

) — June 30, 2023;

Board of Nursing (AS

08.68.010

) — June 30, 2025;

Board of Examiners in Optometry ( AS

08.72.010

) — June 30, 2022;

Board of Pharmacy ( AS

08.80.010

) — June 30, 2022;

State Physical Therapy and Occupational Therapy Board ( AS

08.84.010

) — June 30, 2022;

Board of Psychologist and Psychological Associate Examiners ( AS

08.86.010

) — June 30, 2026;

Real Estate Commission ( AS

08.88.011

) — June 30, 2026;

Board of Certified Real Estate Appraisers ( AS

08.87.010

) — June 30, 2026;

Board of Social Work Examiners ( AS

08.95.010

) — June 30, 2026;

Board of Veterinary Examiners ( AS

08.98.010

) — June 30, 2025.

[Repealed, § 3 ch 74 SLA 1979.]

[Repealed, § 3 ch 74 SLA 1979.]

History.

(§ 2 ch 149 SLA 1977; am §§ 1, 3 ch 74 SLA 1979; am §§ 1, 3 ch 36 SLA 1980; am §§ 1, 3 ch 37 SLA 1980; am §§ 1, 3 ch 38 SLA 1980; am §§ 1, 3 ch 39 SLA 1980; am §§ 1, 3 ch 40 SLA 1980; am §§ 1, 3 ch 41 SLA 1980; am §§ 1, 3 ch 42 SLA 1980; am §§ 1, 2 ch 43 SLA 1980; am §§ 1, 3 ch 67 SLA 1980; am §§ 10, 11 ch 71 SLA 1980; am §§ 6, 7 ch 72 SLA 1980; am §§ 2, 15 ch 82 SLA 1980; am §§ 1, 3 ch 87 SLA 1980; am §§ 7, 8 ch 143 SLA 1980; am §§ 1, 2 ch 153 SLA 1980; am §§ 2, 5 ch 159 SLA 1980; am §§ 41, 42 ch 167 SLA 1980; am §§ 1, 13 ch 52 SLA 1981; am §§ 1, 2 ch 53 SLA 1981; am § 1 ch 28 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 60 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 96 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 8 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 9 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 13 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 29 SLA 1983; am § 2 ch 48 SLA 1983; am §§ 12, 13 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 29 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 49 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 50 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 63 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 4 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 28 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 85 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 36 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 39 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 46 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 71 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 96 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 99 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 137 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 145 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 146 SLA 1986; am § 3 ch 2 FSSLA 1987; am § 4 ch 14 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 55 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 60 SLA 1987; am § 4 ch 74 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 79 SLA 1987; am § 2 ch 87 SLA 1987; am § 48 ch 94 SLA 1987; am § 1 ch 50 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 51 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 57 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 61 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 62 SLA 1988; am § 3 ch 98 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 124 SLA 1988; am § 5 ch 126 SLA 1988; am § 2 ch 132 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 160 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 20 SLA 1989; am § 2 ch 37 SLA 1989; am § 2 ch 40 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 45 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 48 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 2 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 3 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 25 SLA 1990; am § 3 ch 177 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 62 SLA 1991; am § 2 ch 89 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 19 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 20 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 21 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 22 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 23 SLA 1992; am §§ 4, 5 ch 129 SLA 1992; am § 3 ch 130 SLA 1992; am § 21 ch 6 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 20 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 21 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 22 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 23 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 24 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 25 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 23 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 25 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 27 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 48 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 88 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 93 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 95 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 97 SLA 1994; am § 37 ch 101 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 74 SLA 1995; am § 12 ch 91 SLA 1995; am §§ 1, 3 — 7 ch 93 SLA 1995; am § 16 ch 33 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 92 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 93 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 94 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 34 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 36 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 47 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 66 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 5 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 13 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 46 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 52 SLA 1998; am § 4 ch 75 SLA 1998; am § 4 ch 118 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 1 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 9 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 52 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 2 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 5 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 7 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 24 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 46 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 47 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 12 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 16 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 39 SLA 2002; am § 2 ch 58 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 101 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 2 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 10 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 16 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 20 SLA 2003; am § 1 ch 106 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 10 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 11 SLA 2005; am §§ 1 — 6 ch 36 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 38 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 47 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 58 SLA 2005; am § 2 ch 84 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 22 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 23 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 24 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 101 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 9 SLA 2007; am § 1 ch 12 SLA 2007; am § 1 ch 31 SLA 2007; am § 1 ch 49 SLA 2007; am § 4 ch 19 SLA 2008; am § 1 ch 25 SLA 2008; am § 56 ch 40 SLA 2008; am § 1 ch 114 SLA 2008; am § 1 ch 23 SLA 2009; am § 1 ch 29 SLA 2009; am § 1 ch 39 SLA 2009; am § 1 ch 46 SLA 2009; am § 1 ch 31 SLA 2010; am § 1 ch 32 SLA 2010; am § 1 ch 33 SLA 2010; am § 1 ch 34 SLA 2010; am § 1 ch 53 SLA 2010; am § 1 ch 55 SLA 2010; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 23 SLA 2012; am § 1 ch 30 SLA 2013; am § 1 ch 31 SLA 2013; am § 1 ch 39 SLA 2013; am § 1 ch 41 SLA 2013; am § 1 ch 31 SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 32 SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 33 SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 34 SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 42 SLA 2014; am § 3 ch 114 SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 18 SLA 2015; am § 1 ch 24 SLA 2016; am § 1 ch 59 SLA 2016; am § 1 ch 7 SLA 2017; am § 1 ch 11 SLA 2017; am § 1 ch 12 SLA 2017; am § 1 ch 9 SLA 2018; am § 1 ch 39 SLA 2018; am § 1 ch 40 SLA 2018; am § 1 ch 41 SLA 2018; am § 1 ch 42 SLA 2018; am § 1 ch 43 SLA 2018; am § 1 ch 44 SLA 2018; am § 1 ch 45 SLA 2018; am § 1 ch 14 SLA 2019; am § 1 ch 16 SLA 2019; am § 1 ch 23 SLA 2019; am §§
1, 2 ch 26 SLA 2019; am § 1 ch 20 SLA 2020; am § 1 ch 6 SLA 2021; am § 1 ch 8 SLA 2021; am § 1 ch 23 SLA 2021)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (c) was reorganized in 1991, 2010, and 2014 to place the paragraphs in alphabetical order by occupation.

Cross references. —

For termination dates of other boards, councils, or commissions, see AS

44.66.010(a)

.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2014 amendment, effective June 19, 2014, extended the termination date of the State Physical Therapy and Occupational Therapy Board from June 30, 2014 to June 30, 2022.

The second 2014 amendment, effective June 19, 2014, extended the termination date of the Board of Chiropractic Examiners from June 30, 2014 to June 30, 2022.

The third 2014 amendment, effective June 19, 2014, extended the termination date of the Board of Marital and Family Therapy from June 30, 2014 to June 30, 2018.

The fourth 2014 amendment, effective June 19, 2014, extended the termination date of the Board of Examiners in Optometry from June 30, 2014 to June 30, 2022.

The fifth 2014 amendment, effective June 19, 2014, extended the termination date of the Board of Certified Real Estate Appraisers from June 30, 2014 to June 30, 2018.

The sixth 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, added present (c)(12).

The 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, in (c)(8) substituted “June 30, 2017” for “June 30, 2015”.

The 2016 amendment, effective June 21, 2016, in (19), substituted “2018” for “2016”.

The first 2017 amendment, effective May 14, 2017, in (c)(8), substituted “June 30, 2021” for “June 30, 2017”.

The second 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, in (c)(3), substituted “June 30, 2025” for “June 30, 2017”.

The third 2017 amendment, effective June 17, 2017, in (c)(22), substituted “June 30, 2025” for “June 30, 2017”.

The first 2018 amendment, effective May 16, 2018, in (c)(12), substituted “June 30, 2024” for “June 30, 2018”.

The second 2018 amendment, effective June 30, 2018, in (c)(20), substituted “June 30, 2026” for “June 30, 2018”.

The third 2018 amendment, effective June 30, 2018, in (c)(19), substituted “June 30, 2026” for “June 30, 2018”.

The fourth 2018 amendment, effective June 30, 2018, in (c)(18), substituted “June 30, 2026” for “June 30, 2018”.

The fifth 2018 amendment, effective June 30, 2018, in (c)(6), substituted “June 30, 2026” for “June 30, 2018”.

The sixth 2018 amendment, effective June 30, 2018, in (c)(21), substituted “June 30, 2026” for “June 30, 2018”.

The seventh 2018 amendment, effective June 30, 2018, in (c)(16), substituted “June 30, 2022” for “June 30, 2018”.

The eighth 2018 amendment, effective June 30, 2018, in (c)(11), substituted “June 30, 2026” for “June 30, 2018”.

The first 2019 amendment, effective August 2, 2019, in (c)(7), substituted “June 30, 2027” for “June 30, 2019”.

The second 2019 amendment, effective August 9, 2019, in (c)(14), substituted “June 30, 2025” for “June 30, 2019”.

The third 2019 amendment, effective August 17, 2019, in (c)(10), substituted “June 30, 2027” for “June 30, 2019”.

The fourth 2019 amendment, effective September 14, 2019, in (c)(4), substituted “June 30, 2027” for “June 30, 2019” and in (c)(9), substituted “June 30, 2024” for “June 30, 2019.”

The 2020 amendment, effective April 21, 2020, in (c)(13), substituted “June 30, 2023” for “June 30, 2020”.

The first 2021 amendment, effective June 10, 2021, in (c)(8), substituted “June 30, 2023” for “June 30, 2021” at the end.

The second 2021 amendment, effective June 10, 2021, in (c)(1), substituted “June 30, 2029” for “June 30, 2021” at the end.

The third 2021 amendment, effective July 22, 2021, in (c)(2), substituted “June 30, 2029” for “June 30, 2021” at the end.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 8, ch. 23, SLA 2012, the 2012 amendments to (c)(4), (7), and (13) of this section are retroactive to June 30, 2011.

Sec. 08.03.020.
Procedures governing termination, transition, and continuation.

Upon termination, each board listed in AS

08.03.010

shall continue in existence until June 30 of the next succeeding year for the purpose of concluding its affairs. During this period, termination does not reduce or otherwise limit the powers or authority of each board. One year after the date of termination, a board not continued shall cease all activities, and the statutory authority of the board is transferred to the department.

The termination, dissolution, continuation or reestablishment of a regulatory board shall be governed by the legislative oversight procedures of AS

44.66.050

.

A board scheduled for termination under this chapter may be continued or reestablished by the legislature for a period not to exceed eight years unless the board is continued or reestablished for a longer period under AS

08.03.010

.

The department shall carry out the functions of a board that has ceased all activities under (a) of this section. Litigation, hearings, investigations, and other proceedings pending at the time the board ceased activities continue in effect and may be continued or completed by the department. Licenses, certificates, orders, and regulations issued or adopted by the board and in effect at the time the board ceased activities remain in effect for the term issued or until revoked, amended, vacated, or repealed by the department.

History.

(§ 2 ch 74 SLA 1979; am § 2 ch 36 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 37 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 38 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 39 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 40 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 41 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 42 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 67 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 87 SLA 1980; am §§ 2 — 4 ch 58 SLA 2005)

Cross references. —

For procedures governing review, termination, and continuation of other boards, councils, or commissions, see AS 44.66.